Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1214
State agency; disposition
of records; procedure.

Whenever any state agency desires to dispose of records which
are not listed on an approved records retention and disposition schedule applicable
to such agency, the state agency head shall prepare
and submit to the administrator, on forms provided by the administrator, a
list of the records sought to be disposed of and
a request for approval of their disposition, which list and request shall
be referred to the board for action at its next regular or special session.
On consideration thereof, the board may approve such disposition thereof as
may be legal and proper or
may refuse to approve any disposition, and the records as to which such determination
has been made may thereupon be disposed of in accordance with the approval
of the board.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 14, p. 1392;

Laws 1969, c. 841, § 10, p. 3174;

Laws 1976, LB 641, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 20.